Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 5
Wills

§ 15-2-501. Who may make a will.

Any emancipated minor or any person eighteen (18) or more years of age who is of sound mind may make a will. A married woman may dispose of her property, whether separate or community, in the same manner as any other person subject to the restrictions imposed by this code.

§ 15-2-502. Execution.

Except as provided for holographic wills, writings within section 15-2-513[, Idaho Code,] of this part, and wills within section 15-2-506[, Idaho Code,] of this part, or except as provided in section 51-109, Idaho Code, every will shall be in writing signed by the testator or in the testator’s name by some other person in the testator’s presence and by his direction, and shall be signed by at least two (2) persons each of whom witnessed either the signing or the testator’s acknowledgment of the signature or of the will.

Form of Will.

§ 15-2-503. Holographic will.

A will which does not comply with section 15-2-502[, Idaho Code,] of this Part is valid as a holographic will, whether or not witnessed, if the signature and the material provisions are in the handwriting of the testator.

§ 15-2-504. Self-proved will.

Any will may be simultaneously executed, attested, and made self-proved, by the acknowledgment thereof by the testator and the affidavits of the witnesses, each made before an officer authorized to administer oaths under the laws of the state where execution occurs and evidenced by the officer’s certificate, under official seal, in form and content substantially as follows:

An attested will may at any time subsequent to its execution be made self-proved by the acknowledgment thereof by the testator and the affidavits of the witnesses, each made before an officer authorized to administer oaths under the laws of the state where the acknowledgment occurs and evidenced by the officer’s certificate, under the official seal, attached or annexed to the will in form and content substantially as follows:

A will may be executed, and made self-proved, in compliance with section 51-109, Idaho Code, and attested as set forth in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

I, ......., the testator, sign my name to this instrument this ........ day of ........, ..., and being first duly sworn, do hereby declare to the undersigned authority that I sign and execute this instrument as my last will and that I sign it willingly (or willingly direct another to sign for me), that I execute it as my free and voluntary act for the purposes therein expressed, and that I am eighteen (18) years of age or older, of sound mind, and under no constraint or undue influence.

...............................

Testator

We, ............, ............, the witnesses, sign our names to this instrument, being first duly sworn, and do hereby declare to the undersigned authority that the testator signs and executes this instrument as his last will and that he signs it willingly (or willingly directs another to sign for him), and that each of us, in the presence and hearing of the testator, hereby signs this will as witness to the testator’s signing, and that to the best of his knowledge the testator is eighteen (18) years of age or older, of sound mind, and under no constraint or undue influence.

...............................

Witness

...............................

Witness

The State of ..........

County of .............

Subscribed, sworn to and acknowledged before me by .........., the testator and subscribed and sworn to before me by .........., and .........., witnesses, this ..... day of ..........

(Seal)

(Signed) ...............................

...............................

(Official capacity of officer)

The State of ............

County of ...............

We, .........., ..........., and .........., the testator and the witnesses, respectively, whose names are signed to the attached or foregoing instrument, being first duly sworn do hereby declare to the undersigned authority that the testator signed and executed the instrument as his last will and that he had signed willingly (or willingly directed another to sign for him), and that he executed it as his free and voluntary act for the purposes therein expressed, and that each of the witnesses, in the presence and hearing of the testator, signed the will as witness and that to the best of his knowledge the testator was at that time eighteen (18) years of age or older, of sound mind and under no constraint or undue influence.
...............................

Testator

...............................

Witness

...............................

Witness

Subscribed, sworn to and acknowledged before me by .........., the testator, and subscribed and sworn to before me by .........., and .........., witnesses, this ..... day of .........

(Seal)

(Signed) ...............................

...............................

(Official capacity of officer)

§ 15-2-505. Who may witness.

Any person eighteen (18) or more years of age generally competent to be a witness may act as a witness to a will.

A will or any provision thereof is not invalid because the will is signed by an interested witness.

§ 15-2-506. Choice of law as to execution.

A written will is valid if executed in compliance with section 15-2-502 or 15-2-503[, Idaho Code,] of this Part or if its execution complies with the law at the time of execution of the place where the will is executed, or of the law of the place where at the time of execution or at the time of death the testator is domiciled, has a place of abode or is a national.

§ 15-2-507. Revocation by writing or by act.

A will or any part thereof is revoked:

By a subsequent will which revokes the prior will or part expressly or by inconsistency; or

By being burned, torn, canceled, obliterated or destroyed, with the intent and for the purpose of revoking it by the testator or by another person in his presence and by his direction.

The revocation of a will executed in duplicate may be accomplished by revoking one (1) of the duplicates.

§ 15-2-508. Revocation by divorce — No revocation by other changes of circumstances.

If after executing a will the testator is divorced or his marriage annulled, the divorce or annulment revokes any disposition or appointment of property made by the will to the former spouse, any provision conferring a general or special power of appointment on the former spouse, and any nomination of the former spouse as executor, trustee, conservator, or guardian, unless the will expressly provides otherwise. Property prevented from passing to a former spouse because of revocation by divorce or annulment passes as if the former spouse failed to survive the decedent, and other provisions conferring some power or office on the former spouse are interpreted as if the spouse failed to survive the decedent. If provisions are revoked solely by this section, they are revived by testator’s remarriage to the former spouse. For purposes of this section, divorce or annulment means any divorce or annulment which would exclude the spouse as a surviving spouse within the meaning of subsection (b) of section 15-2-802[, Idaho Code,] of this code. A decree of separation which does not terminate the status of husband and wife is not a divorce for purposes of this section. No change of circumstances other than as described in this section revokes a will.

§ 15-2-509. Revival of revoked will.

If a second will which, had it remained effective at death, would have revoked the first will in whole or in part, is thereafter revoked by acts under section 15-2-507[, Idaho Code,] of this chapter, the first will is revoked in whole or in part unless it is evident from the circumstances of the revocation of the second will or from testator’s contemporary or subsequent declarations that he intended the first will to take effect as executed.

If a second will which, had it remained effective at death, would have revoked the first will in whole or in part, is thereafter revoked by a third will, the first will is revoked in whole or in part, except to the extent it appears from the terms of the third will that the testator intended the first will to take effect.

Republication of a revoked will revives such will.

§ 15-2-510. Incorporation by reference.

Any writing in existence when a will is executed may be incorporated by reference if the language of the will manifests this intent and describes the writing sufficiently to permit its identification.

§ 15-2-511. Testamentary additions to trusts.

A will may validly devise property to the trustee of a trust established or to be established:
(1)(a) A will may validly devise property to the trustee of a trust established or to be established:

During the testator’s lifetime by the testator or by the testator and some other person or by some other person, including a funded or unfunded life insurance trust, although the trustor has reserved any or all rights of ownership of the insurance contracts; or

At the testator’s death by the testator’s devise to the trustee if the trust is identified in the testator’s will and its terms are set forth in a written instrument, other than a will, executed before, concurrently with, or after the execution of the testator’s will or in another individual’s will if that other individual has predeceased the testator, regardless of the existence, size, or character of the corpus of the trust.

The devise is not invalid because the trust is amendable or revocable, or because the trust was amended after the execution of the will or the testator’s death.

Unless the testator’s will provides otherwise, property devised to a trust described in subsection (1) of this section is not held under a testamentary trust of the testator but it becomes a part of the trust to which it is devised and must be administered and disposed of in accordance with the provisions of the governing instrument setting forth the terms of the trust, including any amendments thereto made before or after the testator’s death.

Unless the testator’s will provides otherwise a revocation or termination of the trust before the testator’s death causes the devise to lapse.

§ 15-2-512. Events of independent significance.

A will may dispose of property by reference to acts and events which have significance apart from their effect upon the dispositions made by the will, whether they occur before or after the execution of the will or before or after the testator’s death. The execution or revocation of a will of another person is such an event.

§ 15-2-513. Separate writing identifying bequest of tangible property.

Whether or not the provisions relating to holographic wills apply, a will may refer to a written statement or list to dispose of items of tangible personal property not otherwise specifically disposed of by the will, other than money, evidences of indebtedness, documents of title, and securities, and property used in trade or business. To be admissible under this section as evidence of the intended disposition, the writing must either be in the handwriting of the testator or be signed by him and must describe the items and the devisees with reasonable certainty. The writing may be referred to as one to be in existence at the time of the testator’s death; it may be prepared before or after the execution of the will; it may be altered by the testator after its preparation; and it may be a writing which has no significance apart from its effect upon the dispositions made by the will.